Arkansas, session 2025, SB417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-60-703(b)(1)(H), concerning the inclusion
of affirmative action program summaries in the Comprehensive Arkansas Higher
Education Annual Report, is repealed.
(H) Affirmative action programs summaries, § 6-63-103;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-60-703(b)(2) and (3), concerning the
contents of the Comprehensive Arkansas Higher Education Annual Report
biennially and every five (5) years, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Biennially, each even-numbered year:
(A) A financial condition report, § 6-61-222; and
(B) Changes to affirmative action program plans, § 6-63-
103; and
*CRH246*
03/10/2025 2:56:07 PM CRH246

SB417
(C) Economic development goals and educational efforts, §
6-61-207; and
(3) Every five (5) years, beginning in 2015:
(A) Minority retention plans, § 6-61-122; and
(B) Affirmative action program plans, § 6-63-103(c).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-61-141 is repealed.
6-61-141. Duplication of services.
An institution of higher education that has its main campus, satellite
campus, or center located within a twenty-five-mile radius of another main
campus of an institution of higher education shall enter into a written
agreement with that institution of higher education that shall address
duplication of services between the institutions of higher education.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-61-221(d)(2), concerning the inclusion of
reporting of graduates requiring postsecondary remediation within the
Comprehensive Arkansas Higher Education Annual Report, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) The reports developed under this section shall be prepared
on or before October 1 each year and include the cost of remediation for each
state-supported institution of higher education, which shall be submitted to
the Division of Higher Education according to standards developed by the
Division of Higher Education and shall include for each state-supported
institution of higher education:
(A) The amount of institutional revenue spent on
remediation;
(B) The total general revenue subsidy spent on
remediation;
(C) The total institutional expenditure for remediation;
and
(D) The general revenue percentage of total expenditures
for remediation.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 61, Subchapter 16, is
repealed.
6-61-1601. Findings.
03/10/2025 2:56:07 PM CRH246

SB417
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) There is a need to create and promote a comprehensive energy
summary and report for the state.
(2) The collaboration of all state-supported institutions of
higher education that participate in energy research activities is vital to
ensure an orderly and effective set of data and other research necessary to
promote energy conservation and develop alternative energy sources on a
statewide level.

6-61-1602. Institutional Energy Research Committee — Creation —
Purpose.
(a) The Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall coordinate
the efforts of all state-supported institutions that participate in energy
research activities in the development of the Arkansas Energy Summary and
Report.
(b) The Division of Higher Education, in collaboration with state-
supported institutions of higher education that participate in energy
research activities, shall appoint at least one (1) member of the research
faculty at each state-supported institution of higher education that
participates in energy research activities to serve on the Institutional
Energy Research Committee.
(c)(1) The purpose of the committee is to coordinate ongoing energy
research efforts taking place at each state-supported institution of higher
education and create the Arkansas Energy Summary and Report.
(2) The committee shall modify the Arkansas Energy Summary and
Report as necessary to ensure it is updated with the latest energy research
available.

6-61-1603. Arkansas Energy Summary and Report.
(a) The Institutional Energy Research Committee shall create and adopt
the Arkansas Energy Summary and Report that includes without limitation the:
(1) Energy production and usage in Arkansas, including:
(A) Current sources of energy in Arkansas by percentage
and cost;
(B) Current energy demand and percentage of use of each
energy source, including the production capacity of each energy source;
03/10/2025 2:56:07 PM CRH246

SB417
(C) Projected energy use for the next:
(i) Ten (10) years; and
(ii) Twenty (20) years;
(D) Current and projected cost per kilowatt of additional
energy production capabilities for the following energy sources:
(i) Coal;
(ii) Hydroelectric;
(iii) Natural gas;
(iv) Nuclear;
(v) Solar;
(vi) Wind;
(vii) Lignite; and
(viii) Other; and
(E) Environmental challenges and the impact of each energy
source listed in subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section;
(2) Energy production capacity compared to projected energy
growth;
(3) Economical methods for additional energy sources into the
market; and
(4) Current and possible tax incentives or governmental policies
to promote an increase in energy production capacity for state energy
consumption or export to other states.
(b) The committee shall submit the Arkansas Energy Summary and Report
and relevant data, research, and findings to the Joint Committee on Energy no
later than July 1, 2014.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-62-314 is amended to read as follows:
6-62-314. Construction project exemption.
The following state-supported institutions of higher education shall be
exempt as allowed by § 19-4-1415(b)(5) for construction projects exceeding
five million dollars ($5,000,000) if they have adopted policies and
procedures in compliance with state law involving the awarding and oversight
of the contracts for design and construction services:
(1) Henderson State University;
(2) Southern Arkansas University;
(3) University of Central Arkansas;
03/10/2025 2:56:07 PM CRH246

SB417
(4) National Park College Arkansas Tech University; and
(5) Northwest Arkansas Community College State-supported two-
year colleges; and
(6) Arkansas Tech University.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-62-606(b), concerning the review by the
Building Authority Division of transfer and lease agreements, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) In proceeding under this subchapter, it shall not be necessary for
the board to comply with any other laws relating to the procurement,
disposal, or leasing of property, including without limitation laws
concerning the appointment of appraisers in connection therewith, laws
restricting the obligation of funds for construction, and laws dealing with
the improvement of historic structures, except that the transfer and the
lease agreement shall be subject to the review and approval of the Building
Authority Division.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-63-103 is repealed.
6-63-103. Affirmative action programs — Plans — Annual reports.
(a)(1) Each state-supported institution of higher education shall
prepare an affirmative action program for the recruitment of African-
Americans and other members of minorities for faculty and staff positions and
for enrollment as students.
(2) Affirmative action plans shall be prepared on a continuing
basis for future five-year periods.
(b)(1) Each state-supported institution of higher education shall
prepare annually a summary report on the steps that have been taken to reach
the goals of the plan.
(2) The report shall:
(A) Include information on the progress made by each
institution for the various levels of employment within the institution; and
(B) Be presented in a table format limited to no more than
five (5) pages.
(c) Copies of the five-year plan and annual reports summaries of each
institution of higher education shall be included in the Comprehensive
Arkansas Higher Education Annual Report, filed with the Governor, the
03/10/2025 2:56:07 PM CRH246

SB417
Division of Higher Education, the president and board of trustees of the
institution, the board of visitors of the institution, if applicable, and the
House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education.
(d) In carrying out the affirmative action plans, each institution of
higher education shall provide for a part-time or full-time employee to
assist the institution in the recruitment of African-Americans and other
members of minorities for faculty and staff positions and for enrollment as
students.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-63-321 is amended to read as follows:
6-63-321. Overtime, incentives, and differentials for direct and
indirect unclassified patient care personnel at University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences.
(a) All unclassified positions employed to provide or support patient
care at the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences are eligible for
overtime at the rate of one and one-half (1½) times their regular hourly
rate.
(b) In addition to overtime, unclassified direct and indirect patient
care employees scheduled to work shifts outside of normal operating schedules
may be eligible to receive up to twenty-four percent (24%) of the hourly rate
paid as a shift differential.
(c)(1) All unclassified positions employed to provide or support
patient care at the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences shall be
eligible to receive incentive pay not to exceed one and two-tenths (1.2)
times their base hourly rate.
(2) All unclassified employees required to work in specialty
areas shall be eligible to receive up to ten percent (10%) of the hourly rate
paid as a specialty differential while working in such areas.
(d)(1) When overtime, shift differentials, standby pay, incentive pay,
or specialty differentials are provided to employees as stated in this
section, the total may exceed the line item maximum salaries for those
positions.
(2) This section does not apply to the positions of Patient Care
Administrator, Associate Administrator, or Assistant Administrator of Patient
Care.
(e)(1) In addition, the Board of Trustees of the University of
03/10/2025 2:56:07 PM CRH246

SB417
Arkansas for Medical Sciences may also make special compensation allowances
available, in such amounts as the board may determine or justify equitable in
view of the current requirements for registered nurses in the Clinical
Programs of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences and the
availability of registered nurses for employment in the Little Rock
metropolitan area.
(2) However, the special compensation allowances approved by the
board for a single individual shall not exceed the state line item maximum by
more than twenty percent (20%) for those positions.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-64-218 is amended to read as follows:
6-64-218. Sale of donated land.
(a) The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas may sell any
land donated to the University of Arkansas by individuals.
(b) When the purchase price is paid to the treasurer of the
university, the president and secretary of the board or designee shall
execute a deed conveying the lands to the purchaser.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1415(c)(2), concerning the
requirement for institutions of higher education to submit a summary of
contract amendments to the Legislative Council, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) The institutions of higher education stated in
subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall perform all duties and
responsibilities stated in subdivision (c)(1) of this section under policies
and procedures adopted by their governing boards.
(B) They shall submit a summary of all contract amendments
to the Legislative Council.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 21-4-203(12), concerning the definition of
"state agencies" under the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(12) “State agencies” means all agencies, departments, boards,
commissions, bureaus, councils, state-supported institutions of higher
education, or other agencies except the following excluded agencies or
positions within agencies:
03/10/2025 2:56:07 PM CRH246

SB417
(A) The elected constitutional officers of this state and
their employees;
(B) The General Assembly and its employees, including
employees of the Bureau of Legislative Research and Arkansas Legislative
Audit;
(C) Members of the Supreme Court, members of the Court of
Appeals, the Administrative Office of the Courts, circuit courts, and
prosecuting attorneys, but not including deputy prosecuting attorneys;
(D) The Arkansas Department of Transportation; and
(E) All administrative, academic, or other nonclassified
employees of the state-supported State-supported institutions of higher
education;

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 21-4-503 is amended to read as follows:
21-4-503. Applicability of subchapter.
(a) The provisions of §§ 21-4-501 and 21-4-504 apply to:
(1) Employees of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;
(2) Employees of the Arkansas Department of Transportation; and
(3) Classified employees of state-supported institutions of
higher education; and
(4) Employees of all agencies of this state whether in the
executive, legislative, or judicial branch of government.
(b) The provisions of this section or any amendments to this section
shall not change any employee benefits or agreements established under § 6-
57-103, § 6-58-105, or § 6-59-105.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 21-4-505 is amended to read as follows:
21-4-505. Compensation for unused sick leave of nonclassified employees
of state-supported institutions of higher education — Calculation for unused
sick leave.
(a) At its discretion, a state-supported institution of higher
education may compensate a nonclassified an employee of the state-supported
institution of higher education for accumulated unused sick leave by
providing to the nonclassified employee the same compensation for accumulated
unused sick leave provided to a classified employee of the state-supported
institution of higher education under § 21-4-501.
03/10/2025 2:56:07 PM CRH246

SB417
(b) Compensation for accumulated unused sick leave under this section
shall not be used by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System in the
calculation of final average compensation under § 24-4-101.
(c) Unused sick leave for nonclassified employees of state-supported
institutions of higher education shall accrue at the same rate as unused sick
leave accrues under § 21-4-207 for classified employees for calculations made
under this section.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 22-2-114(c), concerning exemption from
regulation and supervision of leasing responsibilities by the Building
Authority Division, is amended to read as follows:
(c) This section shall not apply to an institution of higher
education, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas Department of
Transportation, or the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission.






















03/10/2025 2:56:07 PM CRH246